District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Future Smiles Pilot Program Establishment Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The State Education Office Establishment Act of 2000, effective October 21,
2000 (D.C. Law 13-176; D.C. Official Code § 38-2601 et seq.), is amended by adding a new
section 7m to read as follows:
“Sec. 7m. Future Smiles pilot program.
“(a) In School Year 2027-2028, OSSE shall establish a Level II Dental Assistant career
preparation course for high school students enrolled in participating local educational agencies,
through a partnership with a dental educational program approved by the Board of Dentistry or

accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation (“CODA”). The pilot program shall
operate for 2 school years and serve 2 classes of students.
“(b) The course shall provide classroom instruction by a CODA-approved dental school
or facility to train students to become Level II Dental Assistants, including training students to
pass the certification examination.
“(c) Funds appropriated for the program established by this section shall be used to:
“(1) Compensate participating students competitively;
“(2) Cover transportation costs of participating students; and
“(3) Cover program instructional and student activities costs.
“(d) Following the graduation of the 2027-2028 class, OSSE shall administer a student
satisfaction survey to participants and, by September 30, 2028, publish the results of the survey
and transmit them, along with a blank copy of the survey, to the Council, the Chancellor of the
District of Columbia Public Schools, and the Deputy Mayor of Education.
“(e) Following the graduation of the 2028-2029 class, OSSE shall administer a student
satisfaction survey to participants and, by September 30, 2029, publish the results of the survey
and transmit them, along with a blank copy of the survey, to the Council, the Chancellor of the
District of Columbia Public Schools, and the Deputy Mayor of Education.
“(f) The 2024-2028 District of Columbia Career and Technical State Plan shall include a
report summarizing the outcomes of the program’s 2027-2028 class, including:
"(1) The total number of participants enrolled in the program;
"(2) The total number of participants who successfully completed the program;
"(3) The total number of participants who attempted and the number who passed
the Certified Dental Assistant examination;

"(4) Available demographic data of participants, disaggregated by race, ethnicity,
gender, grade level, and ward of residence;
"(5) The number of program graduates who successfully completed the program
and passed the Certified Dental Assistant (CDA) examination, disaggregated by the following
employment outcomes within one year of graduation;
"(6) The number who acquired full-time employment in a dental office or dental-
related setting;
"(7) The number who acquired part-time employment in a dental office or dental-
related setting;
"(8) Type of employer, categorized as:
“(A) Private dental practice;
“(B) Community-based clinic;
“(C) School-based dental clinic;
“(D) Hospital or medical center; and
“(E) Other type of employment;
"(9) Whether the employment was obtained through or in connection with a
program partner organization; and
"(10) Any additional information OSSE deems necessary to evaluate the
effectiveness of the program.
“(g) Following the graduation of the 2028-2029 class, OSSE shall publish the report on
the program’s outcomes, as specified in (f), on their website by December 1, 2029, or include it
in the 2028-2032 Career and Technical Education State Plan.

“(h) For the purposes of this section, the term “Level II Dental Assistant” means an
individual who is registered by the Board of Dentistry and who has met the education and
certification requirements for Level II, and who, under direct supervision of a licensed dentist, is
authorized to perform all functions permitted to a Level I Dental Assistant in addition to:
“(1) Performing vitality tests;
“(2) Taking alginate impressions for intraoral appliances;
“(3) Applying desensitizing agents;
“(4) Placing or removing a rubber dam;
“(5) Etching;
“(6) Fabricating indirect restorations in a dental office;
“(7) Placing or removing a matrix band;
“(8) Drying a root canal;
“(9) Preparing and fitting stainless steel crowns;
“(10) Preparing temporary crowns;
“(11) Removing excess cement; and
“(12) Removing or placing a periodontal dressing (except placing the original
periodontal dressing).”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
100 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
101 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
102 Sec. 4. Effective date.

103 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
104 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
105 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
106 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).